Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.340

Running start program—Enrolled students not displaced.

Once a pupil has been enrolled in a postsecondary course or program under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400, the pupil shall not be displaced by another student.

[ 1994 c 205 s 5; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 405.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.